Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1330
Nonintoxicating beverages, milk, and milk products; brand or mark on container; filing with Secretary of State; publication; certificate; fee.

Any person engaged in manufacturing, bottling or selling soda waters, mineral or aerated waters, cider, ginger ale and other unintoxicating beverages, milk, buttermilk, cream, ice cream or butter in any kind of receptacle having the name of such person or other mark or device printed, stamped, engraved, etched, blown, impressed, riveted or otherwise produced or permanently fixed upon the same, may file in the office of the Secretary of State for record a description of the name, mark, or device so used and cause such description to be printed once each week for three successive weeks in a newspaper published in the county in which the principal place of business of such person is located, or if the principal place of business of such person is located in another state, then in the county wherein the principal office or depot within the State of Nebraska is located. It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to issue to the person so filing for record a description of such name, mark, or device in his office, a duly attested certificate of the record of the same, for which he shall receive a fee of one dollar. Such certificate in all prosecutions under sections 28-1329 to 28-1334 shall be prima facie evidence of the adoption of such name, mark, or device, and of the right of the person named therein to adopt and use the same.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 314.